Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.050

Expenses of committee—Vouchers.

All expenses incurred by the committee, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided by the auditor. The legislative auditor may be authorized by the *legislative budget committee's executive committee to sign vouchers. Such authorization shall specify a dollar limitation and be set out in writing. A monthly report of such vouchers shall be submitted to the executive committee. If authorization is not given to the legislative auditor then the chair, or the vice chair in the chair's absence, is authorized to sign vouchers. This authority shall continue until the chair's or vice chair's successors are selected after each ensuing session of the legislature. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated generally by the legislature for legislative expenses or upon any special appropriation which may be provided by the legislature for the expenses of the committee or both.

[ 1989 c 137 s 1; 1955 c 206 s 7; 1951 c 43 s 15.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "legislative budget committee" was redesignated the "joint legislative audit and review committee" by 1996 c 288 s 3.

Vouchers on public funds: Chapter 42.24 RCW.